Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the First-Class City Merger Act:

(1) City means a city of the first class; and

(2) Merger means a full and permanent union of two or more cities of the first class, resulting in one city.

Laws 2008, LB1056, § 2.